Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5125
Canadian Government and government-guaranteed obligations.

An insurer may invest in direct obligations of the government of Canada or obligations for which the full faith and credit of the government of Canada is pledged for the payment of all principal and interest.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 25.